Wyoming statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 6 Access Facilities

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d Highways, Streets and Bridges §§ 202 to 209.

39A C.J.S. Highways §§ 37 to 95, 141 to 143.

§ 24-6-101.
Purpose.

The legislature hereby finds, determines, and declares that this act [§§

24-6-101

through

24-6-110

] is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, and for the promotion of the general welfare.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 85, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 48-346; W.S. 1957, § 24-70.

Quoted

in

Woolley v. State Hwy. Comm'n, 387 P.2d 667,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1963).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Abutting owner's right to damages or other relief for loss of access because of limited access highway or street, 43 ALR2d 1072, 42 ALR3d 13, 42 ALR3d 148.

Power to regulate or prohibit abutter's access to street or highway, 73 ALR2d 652.

Power to restrict or interfere with access of abutter by traffic regulations, 73 ALR2d 689.

Abutting owner's right to damages for limitation of access caused by conversion of conventional road into limited access highway, 42 ALR3d 13.

§ 24-6-102.
Access facility defined.

For the purpose of this act [§§

24-6-101

through

24-6-110

], an access facility is defined as a highway or street especially designed for through traffic, and over, from or to which owners or occupants of abutting land or other persons have no right or easement or only a limited right or easement of access, light, air, or view by reason of the fact that their property abuts upon such controlled access facility or for any other reason. Such highways or streets may be parkways, from which trucks, buses and other commercial vehicles may be excluded; or they may be freeways open to use by all customary forms of street and highway traffic.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 85, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 48-347; Laws 1955, ch. 42, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 24-71.

Applied

in

HKD Homesite Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 69 Wyo. 236, 240 P.2d 885,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(1952).

Stated

in

Town of Clearmont v. State Hwy. Comm'n, 357 P.2d 470,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo 1960).

§ 24-6-103.
Highway authorities to plan access facilities; scope and limitations of authority.

The highway authorities of the state, counties, cities, towns, and villages, acting alone or in cooperation with each other or with any federal, state, or local agency of any other state having authority to participate in the construction and maintenance of highways, are hereby authorized to plan, designate, establish, regulate, vacate, alter, improve, maintain, and provide access facilities for public use wherever such authority or authorities are of the opinion that traffic conditions, present or future, will justify such special facilities; provided, that within cities, towns and villages such authority shall be subject to such municipal consent as may be provided by law. Said highway authorities of the state, counties, cities, villages, and towns, in addition to the specific powers granted in this act [§§

24-6-101

through

24-6-110

], shall also have and may exercise, relative to access facilities, any and all additional authority now or hereafter vested in them relative to highways or streets within their respective jurisdictions. Said units may regulate, restrict, or prohibit the use of such access facilities by the various classes of vehicles or traffic in a manner consistent with W.S.

24-6-102

.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 85, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 48-348; W.S. 1957, § 24-72.

Legislature has left location and construction of highways exclusively to highway authorities,

and the general rule is that, at least in the absence of statutory provisions, the determination of the necessity or advisability of locating and constructing highways is exclusively in the power of the tribunal created for such purpose by the legislature and the courts have no jurisdiction in such matters. Clearmont v. State Highway Comm'n, 357 P.2d 470,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 1960).

Quoted

in

Woolley v. State Hwy. Comm'n, 387 P.2d 667,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1963).

Stated

in

HKD Homesite Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 69 Wyo. 236, 240 P.2d 885,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(1952).

§ 24-6-104.
Powers of highway authorities generally.

The highway authority of the state, county, city, town, or village may designate and establish access highways as new and additional facilities or may designate and establish an existing street or highway as included within an access facility. The state or any of its subdivisions shall have authority to provide for the elimination of intersections at grade of access facilities with existing state and county roads, and city and town or village streets, by grade separation or service road, or by closing off such roads and streets at the right-of-way boundary line of such access facility; and after the establishment of any access facility, no highway or street which is not part of said facility shall intersect the same at grade. No city, town, or village street, county or state highway or other public way shall be opened into or connected with any such access facility without the consent and previous approval of the highway authority in the state, county, city, town, or village having jurisdiction over such limited access facility. Such consent and approval shall be given only if the public interest shall be served thereby.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 85, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 48-351; W.S. 1957, § 24-73.

§ 24-6-105.
Design and regulation of access to highway.

The highway authorities of the state, county, city and town are authorized to design any access facility and to regulate, restrict or prohibit access as in their opinion may best serve the traffic for which the facility is intended. When an access facility is established under the authority of this act [§§

24-6-101

through

24-6-110

] and if rights of ingress or egress are granted and designated by the highway authorities at specified points along the access facility as provided, the means of ingress or egress to and from the access facility shall be limited to the use designated by the transportation commission. In the event the commission grants a private and not a commercial entrance or access to the highway, the entrance or point of access shall not be used for or in connection with the conduct of any roadside business or other commercial enterprise. The highway authorities are authorized to divide and separate any access facility into separate roadways by the construction of raised curbings, central dividing sections, or other physical separations, or by designating separate roadways by signs, markers, stripes, and the proper lane for such traffic by appropriate signs, markers, stripes and other devices. No person shall have any right of ingress or egress to, from, or across access facilities to or from abutting lands, except at such designated points at which access may be permitted, for the use for which access may be permitted, and upon such terms and conditions as may be specified by proper authority from time to time, or as specifically provided for.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 85, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 48-349; Laws 1957, ch. 67, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 24-74; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to marking of bypasses, see §

24-1-129

.

Quoted

in

HKD Homesite Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 69 Wyo. 236, 240 P.2d 885,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(1952).

§ 24-6-106.
Acquisition of public or private property.

For the purposes of this act [§§

24-6-101

through

24-6-110

], the highway authorities of the state, county, city, town, or village may acquire private or public property and property rights for access facilities and service roads, including rights of access, air, view, and light, by gift, devise, purchase or condemnation in the same manner as such units are now or hereafter may be authorized by law to acquire such property or property rights in connection with highways and streets within their respective jurisdictions. All property rights acquired under the provisions of this act shall be in fee simple where conditions permit, otherwise by appropriate easement.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 85, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 48-350; W.S. 1957, § 24-75.

Cross references. —

As to condemnation of property, see Rule 71.1, W.R.C.P.

Quoted

in

HKD Homesite Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 69 Wyo. 236, 240 P.2d 885,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(1952); Woolley v. State Hwy. Comm'n, 387 P.2d 667,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1963).

§ 24-6-107.
Agreements respecting financing and planning.

The highway authorities of the state, city, county, town, or village are authorized to enter into agreements with each other, or with the federal government, respecting the financing, planning, establishment, improvement, maintenance, use, regulation, or vacation of access facilities or other public ways in their respective jurisdictions, to facilitate the purposes of this act [§§

24-6-101

through

24-6-110

].

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 85, § 7; C.S. 1945, § 48-352; W.S. 1957, § 24-76.

§ 24-6-108.
Property rights of abutting residents.

No access facility shall be constructed without providing for the property rights of residents whose homes or places of business are now located on or abut the said proposed access facility. In all such cases, provisions shall be made to afford said residents access to said facility within five hundred (500) feet of their homes or places of business; or in the alternative, and at the option of the proper highway authorities, service roads shall be built so as to afford said residents a convenient route to the nearest city, town or village adjoining them.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 85, § 9; C.S. 1945, § 48-354; W.S. 1957, § 24-77.

Scope of legislative authority. —

The legislature has a right to provide, as it did in this section, that in lieu of provisions to afford residents access to access facilities within 500 feet of their homes or places of business, proper highway authorities may build service roads so as to afford a “convenient” route to the nearest city or town. However, the legislature cannot infringe upon or take from property owners the right to be compensated, according to the requirement of art. 1, § 33, Wyo. Const.State Highway Comm'n v. Peters, 416 P.2d 390,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1966).

“Now” construed. —

The legislature probably did not intend the word “now” to mean at the time of passage of this chapter. Love v. State Highway Comm'n, 420 P.2d 444,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 1966).

“Residents” construed. —

The term “residents” as used in the first sentence of this section and the term “said residents” as used in other portions of this chapter are not construed to apply to persons residing outside the state of Wyoming. Love v. State Hwy. Comm'n, 420 P.2d 444,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 1966).

Building not constituting a place of business. —

Plaintiff
's building did not constitute a place of business at the time a new highway was constructed, or at any other time. Love v. State Highway Comm'n, 420 P.2d 444,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 1966).

§ 24-6-109.
Local service roads or streets.

In connection with the development of any access facility the state, county, city, town, or village highway authorities are authorized to plan, designate, establish, use, regulate, alter, improve, maintain, and vacate local service roads and streets or to designate as local service roads and streets any existing road or street, and to exercise jurisdiction over service roads in the same manner as is authorized over access facilities under the terms of this act [§§

24-6-101

through

24-6-110

], if in their opinion, such local service roads and streets are necessary or desirable. Such local service roads or streets shall be of appropriate design, and shall be separated from the access facility proper by means of all devices designated as necessary or desirable by the proper authority.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 85, § 8; C.S. 1945, § 48-353; W.S. 1957, § 24-78.

§ 24-6-110.
Prohibited acts.

It shall be unlawful for any person to:

Drive a vehicle over, upon, or across any curb, central dividing section, or other separation or dividing line on access facilities;

Make a left turn, a semicircular, or U-turn except through an opening provided for that purpose in the dividing curb section, separation, or line;

Drive any vehicle except in the proper lane provided for that purpose and in the proper direction and to the right of the central dividing curb, separation section, or line;

Drive any vehicle into the access facility from a local service road except through an opening provided for that purpose in the dividing curb or dividing section or dividing line which separates such service road from the access facility proper.

The performance of a prohibited act shall not be unlawful if necessitated by an emergency resulting from the then existing condition of such access facility or local service road. If access to the facility is made by means of cutting or removal of a fence or gate, the person so doing shall be liable for its repair or replacement under the direction of the department of transportation. Any person who violates any of the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon arrest and conviction shall be punished by a fine of not less than five dollars ($5.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100.00).

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 85, § 10; C.S. 1945, § 48-355; W.S. 1957, § 24-79; Laws 1965, ch. 51, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

Severability and repealing clauses. —

Laws 1949, ch. 85, § 11, provides: “If any section, provision, or clause of this act shall be declared invalid or inapplicable to any person or circumstance, such invalidity or inapplicability shall not be construed to affect the portions not so held or persons or circumstances not so affected. All laws or portions of laws inconsistent with the policy and provision of this act are hereby repealed to the extent of such inconsistency in its application to controlled access facilities provided for in this act.”

§ 24-6-111.
Service stations not to be constructed or located within right-of-way.

No automotive service station or other commercial establishment for serving motor vehicle users shall be constructed or located within the right-of-way of, or on publicly owned or publicly leased land acquired or used for or in connection with, an access facility, as defined by W.S.

24-6-102

.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 178, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 24-79.1.